Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 5. Tenant Remedies.

Sec. 34.03.160.
Noncompliance by the landlord: General.

Except as provided in this chapter, if there is a material noncompliance by the landlord with the rental agreement or a noncompliance with AS

34.03.100

materially affecting health and safety, the tenant may deliver a written notice to the landlord specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and specifying that the rental agreement will terminate upon a date not less than 20 days after receipt of the notice if the breach is not remedied in 10 days, and the rental agreement shall terminate as provided in the notice subject to the provisions of this section. If the breach is remediable by repairs or the payment of damages or otherwise, and the landlord remedies the breach before the date specified in the notice, the rental agreement will not terminate. In the absence of due care by the landlord, if substantially the same act or omission that constituted a prior noncompliance of which notice was given recurs within six months, the tenant may terminate the rental agreement upon at least 10 days written notice specifying the breach and the date of termination of the rental agreement. The tenant may not terminate for a condition caused by the deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of the tenant’s family, or other person on the premises with the tenant’s consent.

Except as provided in this chapter, the tenant may recover damages and obtain injunctive relief for any noncompliance by the landlord with the rental agreement or AS

34.03.100

,

34.03.210

, or

34.03.280

.

The remedy provided in (b) of this section is in addition to a right of the tenant under (a) of this section.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord shall return all prepaid rent or security deposits recoverable by the tenant under AS

34.03.070

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.170.
Failure to deliver possession.

If the landlord fails to deliver possession of the dwelling unit to the tenant as provided in AS

34.03.090

, rent abates until possession is delivered and the tenant may

upon at least 10 days written notice to the landlord terminate the rental agreement and upon termination the landlord shall return all prepaid rent and security deposits; or

demand performance of the rental agreement by the landlord and if the tenant elects, maintain an action for possession of the dwelling unit against the landlord and any person wrongfully in possession and recover the damages sustained.

If a person’s failure to deliver possession is wilful and not in good faith, an aggrieved tenant may recover from that person an amount not to exceed one and one-half times the actual damages.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.180.
Wrongful failure to supply heat, water, hot water or essential services.

If, contrary to the rental agreement or AS

34.03.100

, the landlord deliberately or negligently fails to supply running water, hot water, heat, sanitary facilities, or other essential services, the tenant may give written notice to the landlord specifying the breach and may immediately

procure reasonable amounts of hot water, running water, heat, sanitary facilities, and essential services during the period of the landlord’s noncompliance and deduct their actual and reasonable cost from the rent;

recover damages based on the diminution in the fair rental value of the dwelling unit; or

procure reasonable substitute housing during the period of the landlord’s noncompliance, in which case the tenant is excused from paying rent for the period of the landlord’s noncompliance and, in addition, may recover the amount by which the actual and reasonable cost exceeds rent.

A tenant who proceeds under this section may not proceed under AS

34.03.160

as to that breach.

Rights do not arise under this section until the tenant has given written notice to the landlord. Rights do not arise under this section if the condition was caused by the deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of the tenant’s family, or other person on the premises with the tenant’s consent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990, “or ” was substituted for “of ” preceding “AS

34.03.100

” in (a) of this section to correct a manifest error in ch. 10, SLA 1974.

Sec. 34.03.190.
Landlord’s noncompliance as defense to action for possession or rent.

In an action for possession based upon nonpayment of the rent or in an action for rent when the tenant is in possession, the tenant may counterclaim for any amount recoverable under the rental agreement or this chapter. If a counterclaim is made, the court shall determine whether the defense is supported by the evidence and, if so, may order that

the periodic rent is to be reduced to reflect the diminution in value of the dwelling unit during the period of noncompliance;

the action be continued for a reasonable time to enable the landlord to cure the violation;

the tenant pay into court all or part of the rent accrued and thereafter accruing; if the violations have not been cured within six months, the court shall enter judgment for the defendant and either refund to the defendant all money deposited or use the money for the purpose of making the dwelling fit for human habitation; if the violations have been cured, the court shall determine the amount due to each party; the party to whom a net amount is owed shall be paid first from the money paid into the court, and the balance by the other party; if no rent remains due after application of this section, judgment shall be entered for the tenant in the action for possession;

the tenant vacate the dwelling during the making of necessary repairs, when the repairs cannot be made without vacation of the premises, the tenant to be reinstated upon completion of the repairs.

In an action for rent where the tenant is not in possession, the tenant may counterclaim as provided in (a) of this section but the tenant is not required to pay rent into court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.200.
Fire or casualty damage.

If the dwelling unit or premises are damaged or destroyed by fire or casualty to the extent that enjoyment of the dwelling unit is substantially impaired, the tenant shall

immediately vacate the premises and notify the landlord of the intention to terminate the rental agreement, in which case the rental agreement terminates as of the date of vacating; or

if continued occupancy is lawful, vacate the part of the dwelling unit rendered unusable by the fire or casualty, in which case the tenant’s liability for rent is reduced in proportion to the diminution in the fair rental value of the dwelling unit.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord shall return all prepaid rent and security deposits recoverable under AS

34.03.070

. Accounting for rent in the event of termination or apportionment shall occur as of the date of the casualty.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.210.
Tenant’s remedies for landlord’s unlawful ouster, exclusion, or diminution of service.

If the landlord unlawfully removes or excludes the tenant from the premises or wilfully diminishes services to the tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of electric, gas, water, sanitary, or other essential service to the tenant, the tenant may recover possession or terminate the rental agreement and, in either case, recover an amount not to exceed one and one-half times the actual damages.
If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord shall return all prepaid rent and security deposits recoverable by the tenant under AS

34.03.070

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)